src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - klippa: # 
    klippa+V+Inf: klippa
    klippa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: klippir
    klippa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: klipti
    klippa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kliptu
    klippa+V+Sup: klipt
    klippa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kliptur
